Utah statutes.
34-19-7.   Injunctive relief -- Findings of fact -- Limited application.

No restraining order or temporary or permanent injunction shall be granted in a case involving or growing out of a labor dispute, except on the basis of finding of fact made and filed by the court in the record of the case prior to the issuance of such restraining order or injunction. Every restraining order or injunction granted in a case involving or growing out of a labor dispute shall include only a prohibition of such specific act or acts as may be expressly complained of in the complaint or petition filed in such case and expressly included in the finding of fact made and filed by the court as provided herein and shall be binding only upon the parties to the suit, their agents, servants, employees and attorneys, or those in active concert and participation with them, and who shall by personal service or otherwise have received actual notice of the same.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

